Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 3

Homestead Exemptions

26-2-301. Basic exemption.

An individual, whether a head of family or not, shall be entitled to a homestead exemption upon real property which is owned by the individual and used by the individual or the individual's spouse or dependent, as a principal place of residence. The aggregate value of such homestead exemption shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000); provided, individuals who jointly own and use real property as their principal place of residence shall be entitled to homestead exemptions, the aggregate value of which exemptions combined shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), which shall be divided equally among them in the event the homestead exemptions are claimed in the same proceeding; provided, if only one (1) of the joint owners of real property used as their principal place of residence is involved in the proceeding wherein homestead exemption is claimed, then the individual's homestead exemption shall be five thousand dollars ($5,000). The homestead exemption shall not be subject to execution, attachment, or sale under legal proceedings during the life of the individual. Upon the death of an individual who is head of a family, any such exemption shall inure to the benefit of the surviving spouse and their minor children for as long as the spouse or the minor children use such property as a principal place of residence.

If a marital relationship exists, a homestead exemption shall not be alienated or waived without the joint consent of the spouses.

The homestead exemption shall not operate against public taxes nor shall it operate against debts contracted for the purchase money of such homestead or improvements thereon nor shall it operate against any debt secured by the homestead when the exemption has been waived by written contract.

A deed, installment deed, mortgage, deed of trust, or any other deed or instrument by any other name whatsoever conveying property in which there may be a homestead exemption, duly executed, conveys the property free of homestead exemption, but the homestead exemption may not be waived in a note, other instrument evidencing debt, or any other instrument not conveying property in which homestead exemption may be claimed.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, an unmarried individual who is sixty-two (62) years of age or older shall be entitled to a homestead exemption not exceeding twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500) upon real property that is owned by the individual and used by the individual as a principal place of residence; a married couple, one (1) of whom is sixty-two (62) years of age or older and the other of whom is younger than sixty-two (62) years of age, shall be entitled to a homestead exemption not exceeding twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) upon real property that is owned by one (1) or both of the members of the couple and used by the couple as their principal place of residence; and a married couple, both of whom are sixty-two (62) years of age or older, shall be entitled to a homestead exemption not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) upon real property that is owned by one (1) or both of the members of the couple and used by the couple as their principal place of residence.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, an individual who has one (1) or more minor children in the individual's custody shall be entitled to a homestead exemption not exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) on real property that is owned by the individual and used by the individual as a principal place of residence.

Acts 1870, ch. 80, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 71, § 4; 1879, ch. 171, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 3798; mod. Code 1932, § 7719; Acts 1933, ch. 72, § 1; 1943, ch. 131, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7719; Acts 1975, ch. 285, § 1; 1979, ch. 61, § 1; 1980, ch. 919, § 1; T.C.A., § 26-301; Acts 2004, ch. 659, § 1; 2007, ch. 560, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations shall study the current homestead exemption amounts allowed pursuant to this section to determine whether the exemptions should be increased to accurately reflect the cost of living and shall submit a written report to the members of the general assembly no later than January 1, 2016. The report shall detail the various categories of homestead exemptions and compare each category to the exemptions of other states.

Cross-References. Homestead Act, title 7, ch. 66.

Homestead and personal property exemptions, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 11.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 307, 475.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 425, 648-650, 654, 657, 816.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-224.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, §§ 21, 24, 30; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 13; 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, §§ 2, 5, 6, 8-10; 18 Tenn. Juris., Liens, § 7.

Law Reviews.

A Review of Tennessee Exemptions in Light of the Bankruptcy Code (Jennie D. Latta), 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 35 (1992).

A Second Look at the Proposed Uniform Bankruptcy Exemptions: Tennessee as an Example (The Honorable William Houston Brown, Lawrence Ponoroff), 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 647 (1998).

Bankruptcy Issues Arising in Divorce Practice (Ellen B. Vergos), 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 697 (1994).

Bankruptcy Law — Nobelman v. American Savings Bank: Permissibility of Bifurcating and Modifying Homestead Mortgages, 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 805 (1994).

Davis v. Davis: The End of Interspousal Tort Immunity Tips the Scales on the Last Intrafamilial Immunity Stronghold, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 270 (1984).

Domestic Relations — 1957 Tennessee Survey (William J. Harbison), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1082.

Domestic Relations — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (William J. Harbison), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 892.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

Exempt Property in Tennessee under the Bankruptcy Code (Thomas E. Ray), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1982).

Exemption Statutes — Retrospective Operation of Laws, 11 Tenn. L. Rev. 128.

Homestead in Tennessee (Mark J. Mayfield), 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 261.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

Privy Examination, 3 Tenn. L. Rev. 126.

Protection Against Spousal Disinheritance: A Critical Analysis of Tennessee's New Forced Share System, 28 U. Mem. L. Rev. 561 (1998).

Real Property — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Thomas G. Roady, Jr.), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 839.

Restitution — 1963 Tennessee Survey (J. Brad Reed), 17 Vand. L. Rev. 1139.

Rights of Creditors in Insurance — The Tennessee Exemption Statutes (Paul J. Hartman), 5 Vand. L. Rev. 760.

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries (Sara Kaltenborn), 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327.

Tennessee's Bankruptcy Exemptions are Valid: Rhodes v. Stewart (Bruce D. Fisher), 19-No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1983).

The New Tennessee Code (Charles C. Trabue), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 155.

Attorney General Opinions. Legislation which grants a greater homestead exemption to individuals and married couples sixty-two years of age and older is constitutional, OAG 04-076, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 66 (4/23/04).

26-2-302. Life estates and equitable estates.

Section 26-2-301 shall apply to life estates and equitable estates which are owned by an individual and used by the individual or individual's spouse or dependent as a principal place of residence. The homestead exemption in such estates shall be set apart as the court may prescribe in ordering the sale.

Acts 1870, ch. 80, § 2; Shan., § 3801; Code 1932, § 7722; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 2; T.C.A., § 26-303.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 654.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankrupcty, § 30; 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 6.

26-2-303. Leasehold estates.

Section 26-2-301 shall apply to leasehold real property which is possessed and used by an individual, an individual's spouse, or an individual's dependent, as a principal place of residence, provided such leasehold estate is for more than two (2) and not exceeding fifteen (15) years. The homestead exemption upon leasehold estates shall not be exempt from execution or attachment for rent due thereon.

Acts 1866-1867, ch. 36, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3802, 3803; Code 1932, §§ 7723, 7724; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 3; T.C.A., § 26-304.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 650, 654.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, §§ 6, 8.

26-2-304. Insurance proceeds from homestead.

All moneys arising from insurance on a homestead which is destroyed by fire, or by other disaster, shall be exempt in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). This insurance exemption shall not operate so as to exclude the interest of any mortgagee at the time of the insurance loss so long as the mortgagee's interest is evidenced by a written contract.

Code 1932, § 7734; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 4; T.C.A., § 26-305.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 649, 650, 657.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 30; 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 6.

26-2-305. Family cemeteries and burial lots.

Any interest or estate in a family cemetery, not in excess of one (1) acre, or in a burial lot in a cemetery, or a space in a mausoleum, or a certificate of ownership thereof, is exempt from levy of execution or attachment except as in case of homestead.

Code 1932, § 7735; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-306.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 6.

Law Reviews.

A Review of Tennessee Exemptions in Light of the Bankruptcy Code (Jennie D. Latta), 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 35 (1992).

Exempt Property in Tennessee Under the Bankruptcy Code (Thomas E. Ray), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 7 (1982).

26-2-306. Exemption inapplicable in certain cases.

The homestead shall not be exempt from sale for the payment of public taxes legally assessed upon it, or from sale for the satisfaction of any debt or liability contracted for its purchase or legally incurred for improvements made thereon. It shall be exempt from seizure in criminal as well as in civil cases, but not exempt from distress or sale for taxes; or for fines and costs for voting out of the civil district, precinct or ward in which the voter lives; or for carrying deadly or concealed weapons contrary to law; or for giving away or selling intoxicating liquors on election days.

Acts 1870, ch. 80, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 71, § 5; 1879, ch. 171, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1891, ch. 1, § 19; Shan., § 3799; Code 1932, § 7720; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-307.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 650.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 8; 23 Tenn. Juris., Subrogation, § 9.

26-2-307. Right of selection.

Each individual who is entitled to a homestead exemption shall have the right to elect where the homestead shall be set apart.

Acts 1879, ch. 171, § 1; Shan., § 3800; Code 1932, § 7721; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 5; T.C.A., § 26-308.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 654.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327.

26-2-308. Procedure to set apart.

Whenever real property of an individual who is entitled to a homestead exemption thereon is levied on by execution or attachment, the individual's homestead shall be set apart in the following manner:

The officer executing the writs shall summon three (3) disinterested freeholders, not connected with the parties, and administer to them an oath to set apart the homestead out of the real estate so levied on;

The freeholders shall examine the premises and upon oath set apart the homestead, if so desired by the individual entitled to the exemption, and set out in writing the boundaries thereof, and certify that such is the homestead set apart by them, and deliver the same to the debtor; and

The remainder only of such lands so levied on or attached shall be subject to sale, which fact shall be returned on the execution.

Acts 1870, ch. 80, § 3; 1879, ch. 171, § 3; Shan., § 3804; Code 1932, § 7725; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 6; T.C.A., § 26-309.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 652.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Bankruptcy Law — Nobelman v. American Savings Bank: Permissibility of Bifurcating and Modifying Homestead Mortgages, 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 805 (1994).

26-2-309. Sale and reinvestment of exempt proceeds.

When the real estate levied on is of greater value than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and is so situated that it cannot be divided so as to set apart the homestead, the freeholders shall certify the fact, and the officer may proceed to sell the whole tract, and out of the proceeds the officer shall pay to the clerk of the court rendering the judgment, or condemning the land for sale, five thousand dollars ($5,000), to be invested under the order of the court, in the purchase of a homestead for the debtor, and only the surplus over and above five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be applied to the payment of the execution.

Acts 1870, ch. 80, § 4; Shan., § 3805; Code 1932, § 7726; impl. am. Acts 1933, ch. 72, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7726; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 7; T.C.A., § 26-310.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, §§ 7, 9, 10.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Law and Equal Rights Amendment: Property Law, Employment Relations and Juries, 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 327.

26-2-310. Registration of freeholder's certificate.

The officer shall certify upon the certificate of the freeholders that the same is their act and deed, and the debtor shall have the same registered in the register's office of the county in which the lands lie, and, when so registered, it shall vest in the individual entitled to such homestead exemption, as herein provided, a good and valid title to the land exempt from execution.

Acts 1870, ch. 80, § 5; Shan., § 3806; Code 1932, § 7727; Acts 1979, ch. 61, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-311.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, § 7.

26-2-311. Setting apart for deserted family.

When a debtor absconds or abandons the debtor's family, the homestead shall be set apart for the use of the spouse and family, and shall be exempt in the hands of the spouse or children; and such property, on the death of the owner, shall be exempt in the hands of the surviving spouse and children, as prescribed in § 30-2-105.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 71, § 6; Shan., § 3810al; Code 1932, § 7732; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-312.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Exemptions From Execution and Attachment, §§ 4, 7, 10.

26-2-312. Property purchased with or maintained by fraudulently obtained funds ineligible for homestead exemption.

Property shall not be eligible, in whole or in part, for the homestead exemption provided by this part, if the property has been purchased with or maintained by fraudulently obtained funds or if ownership of the property has been maintained using fraudulently obtained funds. A court shall be required to find by a preponderance of the evidence that the property was purchased with or maintained by funds obtained by defrauding another person or that ownership of the property was maintained by funds obtained by defrauding another person in order to disqualify the property from eligibility for the homestead exemption.

Acts 2014, ch. 803, § 2.